Mississippi, session 2026, HB1567.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  (1) (a)  The Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks shall develop, implement and regulate a mandatory harvest reporting program for white-tailed deer in order to collect and compile harvest data of such quality and quantity as to be able to assist the Legislature and the Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks in formulating the wildlife resource conservation policy for the State of Mississippi.  The harvest reporting program required by this section must be a system that is simple and usable by all sportsmen so as to promote compliance and accurate reporting.  The program may include, but need not be limited to, means such as a mobile smart phone application, online web-based reporting or other electronic or digital methods that promote ease of use by sportsmen. (b)  The department may establish a tagging and reporting program for turkey. (c)  The department shall provide an annual report on the harvest reporting program to the Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks Committees of the Senate and House of Representatives. (2)  (a)  A person who violates any law or regulation implementing and/or regulating the harvest reporting program is guilty of a Class II violation, and is subject to the fines provided in Section 49-7-143. (b)  Each deer or turkey taken or possessed in violation of the harvest reporting program is a separate offense. (3)  (a)  A person convicted of a first violation of the harvest reporting and tagging program shall be assessed and administrative fee of not less than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00), nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), which shall be imposed and collected upon conviction.  A person convicted of a second or subsequent violation shall be assessed an administrative fee of not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), nor more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), which shall be imposed and collected upon conviction. (b)  The clerk of the court shall collect and deposit the administrative fees with the State Treasurer, in the same manner and in accordance with the same procedure, as nearly as practicable, as required for the collection and deposit of state assessments under Section 99-19-73. (c)  The administrative fees shall be credited to the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks and may be expended by the department upon appropriation by the Legislature. SECTION 2. Funds appropriated to the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks may not be expended on the harvest reporting program established in Section 1 of this act.  SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.